Utah statutes.
31A-22-632.   Report to policy holder.
(1)  An insurer shall provide the policyholder a monthly report if an accident
and health rider or supplemental benefit is:
(a)  funded through a life insurance vehicle by acceleration of the death
benefit; and
(b)  in benefit payment status.
(2)  The report required by Subsection (1) shall include:
(a)  any rider or supplemental benefits paid out during the month;
(b)  an explanation of any changes in the policy due to rider or supplemental
benefits being paid out such as:
(i)  death benefits; or
(ii)  cash values; and
(c)  the amount of the rider or supplemental benefits existing or remaining.
